Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 15.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-134
Public accountant; corporation; registration.

A corporation organized
pursuant to the Nebraska Professional Corporation Act which has a place of business in
this state may register with the board as a corporation engaged
in the practice of public accountancy. Application for such registration must be made
upon the affidavit of an officer of such corporation. The board shall in each
case determine whether the applicant is eligible for registration. A corporation
which is so registered and which holds a permit issued under subdivision (1)(c) of section 1-136 may practice public
accountancy and, in that connection, may use a corporate name which indicates,
as a part of such name, that it is engaged in such practice.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 29, p. 64;

Laws 1971, LB 858, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 25;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 15.

Nebraska Professional Corporation Act, see section 21-2201.